Maine, session 132, LD1053.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §4350-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 469, §8 and affected by
§9, is amended to read:
§4350-A. Responsibility to use compensation for benefit of covered persons
1. Compensation used to reduce point-of-sale costs, or improve benefits or lower
premiums. All compensation remitted by or on behalf of a pharmaceutical manufacturer,
developer or labeler, directly or indirectly, to a carrier, or to a pharmacy benefits manager
under contract with a carrier, related to its prescription drug benefits must be: remitted
directly to the covered person at the point of sale to reduce the out-of-pocket costs to the
covered person associated with a particular prescription drug. In implementing this
subsection, the superintendent may regulate a carrier or pharmacy benefits manager only
to the extent permitted by law.
A. Remitted directly to the covered person at the point of sale to reduce the out-of-
pocket cost to the covered person associated with a particular prescription drug; or
B. Remitted to, and retained by, the carrier. Compensation remitted to the carrier must
be applied by the carrier in its plan design and in future plan years to offset the premium
for covered persons.
2. Compliance. Beginning March 1, 2021 and annually thereafter Annually by March
1st, a carrier and a pharmacy benefits manager shall file with the superintendent a report in
the manner and form determined by the superintendent demonstrating how the carrier or
pharmacy benefits manager has complied with this section.
3. Enforcement. The superintendent may impose civil penalties and enforcement
actions pursuant to section 12-A on a carrier or pharmacy benefits manager that violates
this section.
4. Confidentiality. Information provided to the superintendent pursuant to this section
is confidential and may not be disclosed.
5. Federal drug discounts. This section may not be construed to affect discounts that
manufacturers must offer to covered entities or to apply to any covered entity under 42
United States Code, Section 256b.